Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 2. Currency Exchange Licenses.

Sec. 06.55.201.
License required.

A person may not engage in currency exchange or advertise, solicit, or hold the person out as providing currency exchange for which the person receives revenues equal or greater than five percent of total revenues unless the person

holds a currency exchange license;

holds a money transmission license; or

is an authorized delegate of a person who holds a money transmission license.

A currency exchange license is not transferable or assignable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.202.
Application for license.

A person applying for a currency exchange license under AS

06.55.201

—

06.55.204

shall apply in a form and in a medium prescribed by the department. The application must state or contain

the legal name and residential and business addresses of the applicant if the applicant is an individual or, if the applicant is not an individual, the name of each partner, executive officer, manager, and director;

the location of the principal office of the applicant;

the complete addresses of other locations in this state where the applicant proposes to engage in currency exchange, including all mobile locations;

a description of the source of money and credit to be used by the applicant to engage in currency exchange; and

other information the department reasonably requires with respect to the applicant, but not more than the department may require under AS

06.55.101

—

06.55.107

.

A nonrefundable application fee and a currency exchange license fee must accompany an application for a currency exchange license. The currency exchange license fee shall be refunded if the application is denied.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.203.
Issuance of license.

When an application for a currency exchange license is filed under AS

06.55.201

—

06.55.204

, the department shall investigate the applicant’s financial condition and responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and general fitness. The department may conduct an on-site investigation of the applicant, the reasonable cost of which the applicant shall pay. The department shall issue a currency exchange license to an applicant under AS

06.55.201

—

06.55.204

if the department finds that all of the following conditions have been fulfilled:

the applicant has complied with AS

06.55.202

; and

the financial condition and responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant, and the competence, experience, character, and general fitness of the executive officers, managers, directors, and persons in control of the applicant indicate that it is in the interest of the public to permit the applicant to engage in currency exchange.

When an application for an original currency exchange license under AS

06.55.201

—

06.55.204

is complete, the department shall promptly notify the applicant in a record of the date on which the application was determined to be complete, and

the department shall approve or deny the application within 120 days after that date; or

if the application is not approved or denied within 120 days after that date,

the application is approved; and

the department shall issue the currency exchange license under AS

06.55.201

—

06.55.204

to take effect as of the first business day after expiration of the period.

The department may for good cause extend the application period.

An applicant whose application is denied by the department under AS

06.55.201

—

06.55.204

may appeal, within 30 days after receipt of the notice of the denial, from the denial and request a hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.

For examinations, reports, and records, see 3 AAC 13, art. 3.

Sec. 06.55.204.
Renewal of license.

A currency exchange licensee shall pay a biennial renewal fee not later than 30 days before each biennial anniversary of the issuance of the currency exchange license or, if the last day is not a business day, on the next business day.

A currency exchange licensee under AS

06.55.201

—

06.55.204

shall submit a renewal report with the renewal fee, in a form and in a medium prescribed by the department. The renewal report must state or contain

a description of each material change in information submitted by the currency exchange licensee in its original currency exchange license application that has not been reported to the department on any required report; and

a list of the locations in this state where the currency exchange licensee or an authorized delegate of the currency exchange licensee engages in currency exchange, including mobile locations.

If a currency exchange licensee does not file a renewal report and pay its renewal fee by the renewal date or any extension of time granted by the department, the department shall send the currency exchange licensee a notice of suspension. Unless the currency exchange licensee files the report and pays the renewal fee before expiration of 10 days after the notice is sent, the currency exchange license is suspended 10 days after the department sends the notice of suspension.

The department for good cause may grant an extension of the renewal date.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.